Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201464-105.01
Notary public;
disqualified; when.

A notary public is disqualified
from performing a notarial act as authorized by Chapter 64, articles 1 and
2, if the notary:

(1) Is a spouse, ancestor, descendant, or sibling
of the principal, including in-law, step, or half relatives;

(2) Except
in the performance of duties pursuant to sections 64-211 to 64-215, has a
financial or beneficial interest in the transaction other than receipt of
the ordinary notarial fee or is individually named as a party to the transaction;
or

(3) Does not understand the acknowledgment or notarial certificate
used to certify the performance of his or her duties.

Laws 2004, LB 315, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB398, § 4.